test/src/morphology/N-vari42_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - vari: # Noun (42) vari 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     vari+N+Sg+Nom: vari
     vari+N+Sg+Gen: vaŕo
     vari+N+Sg+Par: varjo
     vari+N+Sg+Ill: varjo
     vari+N+Pl+Gen: [varjõ, varja]
     vari+N+Pl+Par: [varjõ, varja]
     vari+N+Pl+Ill: [varjõhe, varjõ, varjahe, varja]
     vari+N+Pl+All: [vaŕõlõ, vaŕalõ]
